North Carolina, session 2025, SB704.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

REMOVE CAP ON COMPENSATION AWARD TO EXONEREES
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 148-84(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) At the hearing the claimant may introduce evidence in the form of affidavits or
testimony to support the claim, and the Attorney General may introduce counter affidavits or
testimony in refutation. If the Industrial Commission finds from the evidence that the claimant
received a pardon of innocence for the reason that the crime was not committed at all, received
a pardon of innocence for the reason that the crime was not committed by the claimant, or that
the claimant was determined to be innocent of all charges by a three-judge panel under
G.S. 15A-1469 and also finds that the claimant was imprisoned and has been vindicated in
connection with the alleged offense for which he or she was imprisoned, the Industrial
Commission shall award to the claimant an amount equal to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for
*S704-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
each year or the pro rata amount for the portion of each year of the imprisonment actually served,
including any time spent awaiting trial. However, (i) in no event shall the compensation,
including the compensation provided in subsection (c) of this section, exceed a total amount of
seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), and (ii) a claimant is not entitled to
compensation for any portion of a prison sentence during which the claimant was also serving a
concurrent sentence for conviction of a crime other than the one for which the pardon of
innocence was granted.
The Director of the Budget shall pay the amount of the award to the claimant out of the
Contingency and Emergency Fund, or out of any other available State funds. The Industrial
Commission shall give written notice of its decision to all parties concerned. The determination
of the Industrial Commission shall be subject to judicial review upon appeal of the claimant or
the State according to the provisions and procedures set forth in Article 31 of Chapter 143 of the
General Statutes."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to awards
made to claimants before, on, or after that date, provided that the retroactive applicability to
awards made prior to the date this section becomes law shall only apply to claimants still living
at the time this section becomes law.

EXONEREES TO RECEIVE MEDICAID COVERAGE
SECTION 2.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits (DHB), is directed to submit an 1115 Demonstration Waiver, State Plan amendment, or
other type of waiver to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) to provide
Medicaid coverage without regard to income, resources, or assets for any person meeting the
criteria of a petitioner under subsections (a) or (b) of G.S. 148-82. This change to Medicaid
eligibility shall begin as soon as practicable only after approval is received from CMS. If approval
is not received from CMS by June 30, 2027, then the report due under subsection (b) of this
section upon a denial shall be due as though a denial of this Medicaid eligibility change had been
received and this subsection shall expire on that date.
SECTION 2.(b) Upon receipt of approval of the 1115 Demonstration Waiver, State
Plan amendment, or other type of waiver required to be submitted under subsection (a) of this
section, DHB shall submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid a report
that confirms the approval of the Medicaid eligibility changes, the date the coverage for any
person meeting the criteria of a petitioner under subsections (a) or (b) of G.S. 148-82 will begin,
and any cost to the State of implementing this Medicaid eligibility without regard to income,
resources, or assets for any person meeting the criteria of a petitioner under subsections (a) or
(b) of G.S. 148-82. Upon receipt of a denial of the 1115 Demonstration Waiver, State Plan
amendment, or other type of waiver required to be submitted under subsection (a) of this section,
DHB shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid that
indicates the decision by CMS and the cost to the State if Medicaid eligibility were extended
without regard to income, resources, or assets for any person meeting the criteria of a petitioner
under subsections (a) or (b) of G.S. 148-82 and there were no federal medical assistance
percentage (FMAP) for that eligibility category.

REQUIRE THE DEPARTMENT OF ADULT CORRECTION TO PROVIDE
APPROPRIATE TRANSITION SERVICES FOR EXONEREES
SECTION 3.(a) Article 8 of Chapter 148 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 148-84.1. Transition services.
(a) Upon release from the custody of the Department of Adult Correction, the Department
shall provide transition services to any person meeting the criteria of a petitioner under
Page 2 Senate Bill 704-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
subsections (a) or (b) of G.S. 148-82. These services shall be specifically tailored to the needs of
the released person, with a priority placed on housing, employment, and sustenance.
(b) The Department of Adult Correction may contract with other public or private entities
for the provision of services required by subsection (a) of this section, though the ultimate
responsibility to provide those services shall remain with the Department.
(c) The cost of transition services provided pursuant to this section shall total no more
than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per released person."
SECTION 3.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to persons
released on or after that date.

EFFECTIVE DATE AND SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 4.(a) Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
SECTION 4.(b) If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional
or invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.
Senate Bill 704-First Edition Page 3